Illinois, session 104th, HB1873.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rivers, Lakes, and Streams Act is amended 5by changing Sections 5 and 25 and by adding Section 5a as 6follows: 7    (615 ILCS 5/5)  (from Ch. 19, par. 52)8    Sec. 5. The Department of Natural Resources shall upon 9behalf of the State of Illinois, have jurisdiction and 10supervision over all of the rivers and lakes of the State of 11Illinois, wherein the State of Illinois or the people of the 12State have any rights or interests, and shall make a list by 13counties of all the waters of Illinois, showing the waters, 14both navigable and non-navigable, that are found in each 15county of the State, and if the same are lakes, the extent of 16the shore lines and the amount, extent and area of the water 17surface; and in a like way, if the same are rivers, and 18specifying whether the same are navigable or non-navigable, 19and whether they have or have not been meandered.20(Source: P.A. 89-445, eff. 2-7-96.) 21    (615 ILCS 5/5a new)22    Sec. 5a. Public right to access and use navigable waters.   HB1873- 2 -LRB104 09769 LNS 19835 b1    (a) The public right to access and use navigable waters 2includes all rights recognized by State or federal law, 3including the rights set forth in the Northwest Ordinance of 41787 and the federal navigational servitude and all rights 5arising under the public trust doctrine, which shall be 6understood and applied in a manner consistent with the spirit 7of section 26 to maximize the full and free enjoyment of State 8waters by the public. Any segment of a lake, river, or stream 9that is capable of supporting use by commercial or 10recreational watercraft for any substantial part of the year, 11or that is actually so used, shall be deemed navigable under 12such laws for purposes of public access and use, unless the 13contrary is proven in litigation by a preponderance of the 14evidence. Public uses in such waters shall include boating, 15tubing, fishing, swimming, and wading. The Department of 16Natural Resources shall protect such public uses against 17interference or encroachment as hereinafter provided in this 18Act. No action or inaction by the Department of Natural 19Resources shall create a presumption, in any civil or criminal 20litigation, against the navigability of any waterway segment.21    (b) The public right to access and use navigable waters 22shall be subject to the following protections and limitations, 23a violation of which shall be punished as otherwise provided 24by law, and, if likely to continue, enjoined by a court of 25competent jurisdiction:26        (1) no person shall interfere with or obstruct public   HB1873- 3 -LRB104 09769 LNS 19835 b1    access to and use of navigable waters for any lawful 2    purpose;3        (2) any person lawfully using navigable waters may 4    touch the beds of bodies of water and adjacent riparian 5    lands as reasonably needed for the person's lawful 6    activities, but any portage on dry land shall be made in a 7    safe manner that is (i) most direct, (ii) least invasive, 8    and (iii) closest to the water;9        (3) any person lawfully using navigable waters shall 10    refrain from littering or otherwise creating a public or 11    private nuisance; and12        (4) any person using navigable waters shall not enter 13    or exit from a point that is not public property or a 14    public roadway without the express or implied permission 15    of the occupant or owner of the property. 16    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit or 17supersede the power or authority of any unit of local 18government to regulate or police public property under the 19ownership or control of the unit of local government, 20including, but not limited to, any segment of a lake, river, 21stream, or any other navigable waters, and the ingress or 22egress thereto, or to otherwise alter the power or authority 23granted to that unit of local government under any State law. 24    (d) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to alter 25the permit requirements and programs set forth in this Act or 26to expand the responsibilities of the Department of Natural   HB1873- 4 -LRB104 09769 LNS 19835 b1Resources under Sections 11, 22, and 23b of this Act  2    (615 ILCS 5/25)  (from Ch. 19, par. 72)3    Sec. 25. The Attorney General, any State's Attorney of any 4county or any attorney authorized by the Department of Natural 5Resources shall have the power to represent said Department, 6and in the name of the State of Illinois, invoke for the 7purposes specified in this act, all of the power of the State 8to prevent the wrongs and injuries herein referred to, and for 9that purpose, such Attorney General, State's attorney or 10authorized attorney shall be deemed to be the proper 11representative of the State, with full power and authority 12upon its behalf to prosecute all necessary suits or actions.13    Nothing in this Act shall limit the right of any person to 14challenge the legality of alleged interference with the public 15right to access or use navigable waters in any appropriate 16civil or criminal litigation. 17(Source: P.A. 89-445, eff. 2-7-96.)